Florida, session 2026, HB1335.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. This act may be cited as "Mattie's Law."
Section 2. Paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section
383.14, Florida Statutes, is amended and paragraph (c) is added
to that subsection and paragraph (i) is added to subsection (3)
of that section, to read:
383.14 Screening for metabolic disorders, other hereditary
and congenital disorders, and environmental risk factors.—
(2) RULES.—
(a) After consultation with the Genetics and Newborn
Screening Advisory Council, The department shall adopt and
enforce rules requiring that every newborn in this state shall:
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1335-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1335 2026
1. Before becoming 1 week of age, have a blood specimen
collected for newborn screenings;
2. Be tested for any condition included on the federal
Recommended Uniform Screening Panel which the council advises
the department should be included under the state's screening
program. After the council recommends that a condition be
included, the department shall submit a legislative budget
request to seek an appropriation to add testing of the condition
to the newborn screening program. The department shall expand
statewide screening of newborns to include screening for such
conditions within 18 months after the council renders such
advice, if a test approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration or a test offered by an alternative vendor is
available. If such a test is not available within 18 months
after the council makes its recommendation, the department shall
implement such screening as soon as a test offered by the United
States Food and Drug Administration or by an alternative vendor
is available;
3. At the appropriate age, be tested for such other
metabolic diseases and hereditary or congenital disorders as the
department may deem necessary; and
4. Beginning January 1, 2027, be screened for biliary
atresia; and
5.4. Subject to legislative appropriation, beginning
January 1, 2027, be screened for Duchenne muscular dystrophy.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1335-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1335 2026
(c) The department shall consult with the Genetics and
Newborn Screening Advisory Council before adopting rules
regarding screening methods, follow-up procedures, and the
inclusion of additional conditions in the screening program.
(3) DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH; POWERS AND DUTIES.—The
department shall administer and provide certain services to
implement the provisions of this section and shall:
(i) By October 1, 2026, implement a statewide public
health education campaign to increase public awareness and
understanding of biliary atresia and its associated risks. The
campaign shall, at a minimum:
1. Educate new and expecting parents on the symptoms of
biliary atresia and the importance of early diagnosis.
2. Provide guidance to health care providers licensed
under chapters 458, 459, and 464 on strategies for identifying
biliary atresia in infants and the risks of delayed treatment.

All provisions of this subsection must be coordinated with the
provisions and plans established under this chapter, chapter
411, and Pub. L. No. 99-457.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1335-00